Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-411. Compelling payment upon delinquency of employer.

If any participating employer fails to remit to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System contributions that are required by law, rule, or regulation by the fifteenth day of the month in which the moneys are due, then the system shall impose an interest penalty of eight percent (8%) per annum with a daily interest accrual.

For purposes of this subsection, an employer's remittance is not delinquent if the employer's remittance is:

Received by the system by the fifteenth day of the month in which the payment is due; or

Postmarked by the fourteenth day of the month in which the payment is due.

The interest penalty shall be determined by the system on the date the delinquent funds are received, and a statement of the interest penalty shall be sent to the participating public employer.

If the interest penalty or delinquent moneys are not received by the system by the last business day of the month in which the moneys were originally due, then the system shall cause the sums of moneys, including the interest penalty, to be transferred from any moneys due the participating employer from the Treasurer of State and the Department of Education as provided in § 19-5-106(a)(5).

This interest penalty shall be computed on the actual days of delinquency and shall be paid to the system to reimburse the trust fund for the money that would have been earned on the moneys had they been paid when due.

If a participating employer fails to file with the system a report required by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System by the fifteenth day of the month in which the report is due, then the system shall impose a penalty of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each late report.

For purposes of this subsection, a report is not late if the report is:

Received by the system by the fifteenth day of the month in which the report is due; or

Postmarked by the fourteenth day of the month in which the report is due.

A statement of the penalty shall be sent to the participating employer.

If the penalty is not received by the last business day of the month in which the report was due, then the system shall cause the penalty amount to be transferred from any moneys due the participating employer from the Treasurer of State and the Department of Education as provided in § 19-5-106(a)(5).

The penalty amounts collected shall be deposited to the credit of the administrative funds of the system to help defray the cost of additional expenses incurred due to the additional work required to process late reports.

In addition to the late report penalty under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the system may impose an additional penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for a report that is filed with the system over one (1) month late.

The board or its designee may waive penalties and interest for an employer delinquency under this section if the board or its designee finds that:

The delinquency was not the result of the employer's nondisclosure, fraud, or misrepresentation; and

Under the circumstances, requiring payment of the delinquency by the employer would be unduly penal, burdensome, or result in a manifest injustice.

If an employer fails to remit system contributions and reports required under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the amount of delinquent funds including contributions, penalties, and interest owed to the system may be deducted from the operating funds designated to the employer through the department and remitted directly by the department to the system's appropriate account for the use and benefits of the members.

The operating funds from which delinquent funds may be deducted for a public school district or open-enrollment public charter school are limited to:

State funding distributed under § 6-20-2305, including without limitation state foundation funding and state categorical funding;

Federal funding to the extent allowed under federal law; and

The net assets of an open-enrollment public charter school deemed property of the state upon revocation or nonrenewal of the charter.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1442; Acts 1993, No. 300, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 5; 2009, No. 467, § 1; 2013, No. 448, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2886.

Publisher's Notes.

As originally amended by Acts 1993, No. 300, § 1 subdivisions (a)(1) and (b)(1) began:

“Beginning July 1, 1993.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), substituted “an interest penalty of six percent per annum with a daily interest accrual” for “a six percent (6%) interest penalty on an annual basis on the moneys due” in (a)(1), and subdivided (a)(2); in (b), substituted “a report required by the board” for “the retirement report” in (b)(1), and subdivided (b)(2); added (c); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment substituted “eight percent (8%) per annum” for “six percent (6%) per annum” in (a)(1); added (b)(6); and added (d).

The 2019 amendment inserted “rule” in (a)(1).

Subchapter 5
— Arkansas Teacher Retirement System — Membership

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 11, as added by Acts 1973, No. 878, § 1: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act would substantially revise the provisions and benefits provided in the Teacher Retirement System law; that it is essential that such revision be given effect on July 1, 1973 in order that the effective date of the Act will coincide with the beginning of a new fiscal year; that under the Constitution of Arkansas, Acts without an emergency clause do not take effect until ninety days after adjournment of the General Assembly and that unless an emergency is declared, extension of the regular session of the General Assembly will result in a delay in the effectiveness of this Act beyond July 1 and would work irreparable harm upon the teachers of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 878, § 2: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 427 of 1973 relating to and making substantial revisions in the Teacher Retirement System did not contain an Emergency Clause; that it is essential to the proper administration of the Teacher Retirement System that the new provisions be given effect on July 1, 1973; that this Act is immediately necessary to amend Act 427 of 1973 to declare an emergency in order that said Act may be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 549, § 16: Mar. 25, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the unprecedented increase in the cost of living has resulted in a particular hardship to persons living on a fixed retirement income in the State of Arkansas; that it is essential to the health and well being of the retired and active schoolteachers of this State that the benefits received by them be increased immediately to offset this unusual cost of living increase and that this act should be given effect immediately in order to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 365, § 9: Mar. 9, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are unfair and inequitable to certain members of the Teacher Retirement System; that correction of these inequities is essential to the well being of members of the Teacher Retirement System and to efficient administration of the system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 619, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, and health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 665, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, and health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1989, No. 652, § 14: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 43, § 11: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 435, § 12: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that changed conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, No. 1206, § 5: Apr. 19, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that even part-time educational personnel are made compulsory members of the Teacher Retirement System; that, in situations where part-time employees work less than thirty (30) days per fiscal year, the administrative cost to the System is more than can be justified, either in benefits accumulated or in investments earned; and that, in such cases, it is necessary to make these persons ineligible for membership in the System. Therefore, in order to promote the more efficient operation of the Teacher Retirement System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 542, § 10: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that changing conditions have dictated that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement System law need to be revised and updated, that these changes are necessary for the System to continue with proper management and administration, and that the revisions in the law are essential to the continued effective operation of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 5: Retroactive to Jan. 1, 2001.

Acts 2001, No. 155, § 7: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System law need to be reconciled with federal tax laws; that these changes should take place retroactively to January 1, 2001; and that this act should have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 742, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that nonteaching employees of Arkansas school districts have more in common with fellow educational employees than with public employees; that allowing the nonteaching employees to earn service credit in the Teacher Retirement System will promote more effective use of educational funds in Arkansas; and that in order to promote the proper operation of the school districts these laws need to be effective at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective beginning July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1146, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that retirants of the Teacher Retirement System are sometimes needed by the public schools of Arkansas to fill vital positions within the educational system of Arkansas; that the current retirement law limits the amount of salary which can be paid to a retiree and the law needs to provide that a teacher may return to active employment after retirement; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2005, No. 146, § 4: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are unclear regarding certain eligibility and benefit requirements; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 97, § 19: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System require technical revisions; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 743, § 8: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 45, § 22: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System assets and accounting are complex, and the system must be able to appropriately manage the system members accounts and benefits; that many of these technical corrections are currently the policy of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and should be codified to reflect that policy; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 69, § 22: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that a member's purchase of service credit currently provides that a member pay the system yesterday's dollars for the value of today's benefits; that such a valuation is unfair to the members as a whole and inconsistent with the prudent management of the system's funds and obligations; that the purchase of service credit in the system should be based upon actuarial equivalents; that the purchase of service credit should be paid in a lump sum to the system; that current service purchase accounts remain unpaid and inactive for many years at a time and create an administrative burden and accounting difficulty on the system that can be remedied by the passage of this act; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2011, No. 565 § 3: Mar. 22, 2011: Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that recent reports indicate that some members of the Arkansas public retirement systems were merely taking themselves off of the payroll for the specified period of time while continuing to perform their duties so that they could draw retirement in addition to their wages; that clarification is needed to prevent this from happening; and that this clarification is needed immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 974, § 9: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are urgently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the school year calendar has historically been expanding with the addition of teacher service requirements and other legislative initiatives while the number of days of service has remained unchanged since the 1970s; that this legislation is necessary to account for the changes in teacher service requirements and to make the retirement system more reflective of the actual number of days of service; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2017, No. 647, § 2: Mar. 24, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial requirements; that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the system and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the system needs to have the ability to make immediate changes to maintain and improve its actuarial status; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the system. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-7-501. Membership generally.

The membership of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall include the following persons:

All teachers who last began service on or after July 1, 1971, and whose service is not covered by another retirement plan similar in purpose to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, except Social Security; and

All nonteachers who begin nonteaching service on or after July 1, 1989, and whose nonteaching service is not covered by another retirement plan similar in purpose to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, except Social Security.

All nonteachers who began nonteaching service before July 1, 1989, whose nonteaching service is covered or coverable by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall continue to be covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for all nonteaching service, both past and future, unless the nonteacher elects to have the nonteaching service after July 1, 2001, covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System under subdivision (a)(2)(C) of this section.

These nonteachers who began service before July 1, 1989, shall be considered members of a closed system to be administered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The employer contribution rate for this closed system shall be established at a rate necessary to fund all present and future liabilities until such time as there are no longer members, retirants, or deferred annuitants.

Beginning July 1, 2001, and each July 1 of each year thereafter, nonteachers who participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System may elect to become members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Service credit while a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System cannot be established in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The election to withdraw from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and become a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be made by May 31, 2001, or by May 31 of each year thereafter, and notice of the election shall be made in writing and filed with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The election to participate in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be irrevocable.

School resource officers who are qualified under this subdivision (a)(3) and elect to participate in the system on or after July 1, 2013.

To participate in the system:

A school resource officer paid indirectly by a system employer shall be:

A retiree of a reciprocal system;

An Arkansas-certified law enforcement officer; and

Employed primarily to provide services at a system employer; and

A school resource officer paid indirectly by a system employer shall not:

Have participated in the Arkansas Police Officers' Deferred Retirement Option Plan; and

Be eligible to participate as an active member of the public retirement system that covers the direct employer of the school resource officer.

A school resource officer shall not receive retirement credit for the same service or salary in another public retirement system in Arkansas.

A system employer may authorize a school resource officer who is indirectly paid by the system employer to participate as a member of the system by adopting a resolution.

A resolution adopted by the system employer shall:

Authorize a school resource officer employed by the system employer to participate as a member of the system; and

State the employer's agreement to act as the system employer for the purpose of reporting service, paying contributions to the system on behalf of a school resource officer, and performing all member services as if the school resource officer were directly employed by the system employer.

A school resource officer paid indirectly by a system employer is not eligible to participate as a system member unless the system employer explicitly authorizes such participation by resolution.

The salary and service used to determine contributions and benefits in the system shall be based on the salary paid to the school resource officer for performing the services of a school resource officer for the system employer.

If an employer reimburses another public entity for the payment of the school resource officer's salary and salary-related costs, the employer receiving the employment services of the school resource officer shall be the system employer for the purpose of system participation and not the direct public employer.

If a system employer pays all or part of a school resource officer's salary indirectly by reimbursing a law enforcement agency in Arkansas, the system shall treat all salary indirectly paid by the system employer to the school resource officer as if it had been paid by the system employer directly.

If a school resource officer becomes a member of the system and his or her salary is paid indirectly by a system employer, then the only employer contribution due on the salary shall be the employer contribution payable to the system.

Service as a school resource officer rendered before July 1, 2013, shall not be purchased.

A person who has excluded himself or herself from membership before July 1, 1991, may rescind the exclusion by filing with the system a membership data form.

The rescission shall be effective July 1 of the fiscal year in which it is exercised.

At the direction of the person, the membership may be prospective only, or both prospective and retroactive.

Before July 1, 2011, for the membership to be retroactive, the member shall pay to the system both the member contributions and the employer contributions that would have been paid to the system if there had been no exclusion, plus interest from the effective date of the excluded service to the date of payment in full.

On or after July 1, 2011, excluded service may be established by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system.

In any case of question as to the system membership status of any person, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall have the final power to decide the question.

Membership in the system shall be a condition of employment under subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

However, except as provided in this section, individual members who are employed for less than one-fourth (¼) of a fiscal year under § 24-7-601 shall not be eligible for any credit or benefit in the system.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 4; 1975, No. 549, § 2; 1977, No. 541, § 1; 1983, No. 619, § 3; 1983, No. 665, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1439; Acts 1987, No. 314, § 1; 1989, No. 652, § 4; 1989, No. 653, § 2; 1991, No. 43, § 3; 1993, No. 1206, § 1; 2001, No. 742, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 6; 2011, No. 69, § 11; 2011, No. 974, § 1; 2013, No. 140, § 3; 2013, No. 449, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added by No. 69 added the (b)(4)(A) designation and (b)(4)(B); and added “Before July 1, 2011” at the beginning of (b)(4)(A).

The 2011 amendment by No. 974, in (d)(2), substituted “However, except as provided in this section” for “Provided, however,” substituted “one-fourth (¼) of a fiscal year under § 24-7-601” for “thirty (30) days within a fiscal year,” and deleted “and any employee contributions made by the member during that period shall be refunded by the system” at the end.

The 2013 amendment by No. 140 repealed (a)(2)(C)(v).

The 2013 amendment by No. 449 added (a)(3).